Washington statutes.
RCW 12.16.080

Procedure on party's refusal to testify.

If a party refuse to attend and testify at the trial, or give his or her deposition before trial, when required, his or her complaint, answer or reply, may be stricken out, and judgment taken against him or her.

[ 2010 c 8 s 3032; Code 1881 s 1876; 1873 p 371 s 175; 1854 p 234 s 64; RRS s 1905.]

NOTES:

Penalty for failure to testify: Rules of court: CR 43(f)(3).